District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.34m

Authority of the Chief Financial Officer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subpart [§§ 2-1217.34a to 2-1217.34n], any action taken by the Mayor to implement the provisions of this subpart [§§ 2-1217.34a to 2-1217.34n] shall be consistent with the Chief Financial Officer’s authority under § 1-204.24d.

History

Dec. 7, 2010, D.C. Law 18-275, § 14, 57 DCR 9873

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 14 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-516, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 7971).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 14 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-573, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10090).